North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-15 Tax Levies and Limitations
57-15-25.1.
County high school equalization fund — Tax levy. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1959, ch. 170, § 25.

57-15-26.
Apportionment of funds withheld for failure to maintain school. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1959, ch. 170, § 25.

57-15-26.1.
General tax levy of recreation service districts.

The board of recreation service district commissioners of a recreation service district created under chapter 11-28.2 may, upon resolution of the board, levy a tax for general purposes in addition to all other levies permitted by law, not exceeding one mill on the taxable valuation of property in the district.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 606, § 60.

57-15-26.2.
Limitations in vector control districts.

Vector control district levies are limited to a tax levy not exceeding one mill on the dollar of taxable valuation in the district in accordance with sections 23-24-08 and 23-24-09.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 606, § 58.

57-15-26.3.
General tax levy of fire protection districts. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 606, § 62; 1985, ch. 235, § 101; 1997, ch. 487, § 1; Repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-26.4.
General tax levy of hospital districts.

The board of directors of a hospital district may annually certify to the proper county auditor or county auditors the probable expense for operating the hospital district. The auditor or auditors may levy a tax not exceeding five mills on the taxable valuation of property within the district for the maintenance of the district for the fiscal year as provided in section 23-30-07.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 606, § 63.

57-15-26.5.
General tax levy of rural ambulance service districts. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 606, § 61; 2001, ch. 511, § 3; Repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-26.6.
Water resource district’s general tax levy.

The board of directors of a water resource district shall estimate expenses of the district and transmit them to the board of county commissioners according to section 61-16.1-06. The board of county commissioners may, by resolution, levy and authorize the county auditor to extend upon the county or portion of the county in the district a tax not exceeding four mills on each dollar of taxable valuation in the county or portion of the county in the district.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 606, § 64.

57-15-26.7.
West river water supply district general tax levy. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 607, § 2.

57-15-26.8.
Garrison Diversion Conservancy District general tax levy.

The board of directors of the Garrison Diversion Conservancy District may levy a tax not exceeding one mill on the taxable valuation of property within the district according to sections 61-24-08 and 61-24-09.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 606, § 66.

57-15-27.
Interim fund.

The governing body of any county, city, park district, or municipality, other than a school district, which is authorized to levy taxes may include in its budget an item to be known as the “interim fund” which must be carried over to the next ensuing fiscal year to meet the cash requirements of all funds or purposes to which the credit of the municipality may be legally extended, for that portion of such fiscal year prior to the receipt of taxes therein. In no case may the interim fund be in excess of the amount reasonably required to finance the municipality for the first nine months of the next ensuing fiscal year. The interim fund may not be in excess of three-fourths of the current annual appropriation for all purposes other than debt retirement purposes and appropriations financed from bond sources.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 10; 1941, ch. 288, § 2; 1943, ch. 268, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 57-1527; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 246; 1989, ch. 231, § 5; 2001, ch. 173, § 13.

57-15-27.1.
Cemetery tax levies.

A city may levy a tax, not exceeding the limitation in subsection 14 of section 57-15-10 to be used exclusively for the care, maintenance, and improvement of established cemeteries, owned and maintained by the city. An organized township may provide funding from revenues derived from its general fund levy authority for the care, maintenance, and improvement of established cemeteries maintained by the township.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 312, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-15271; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 247; 1983, ch. 593, § 61; 1989, ch. 699, § 1; 2015, ch. 439, § 84, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-27.2.
Abandoned cemetery tax levies. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 221, § 2; 1983, ch. 593, § 62; Repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-28.
Emergency fund — County.

The governing body of any county may levy a tax for emergency purposes not exceeding the limitation in subsection 9 of section 57-15-06.7. The emergency fund may not be considered in determining the budget or the amount to be levied for each fiscal year for normal tax purposes but must be shown in the budget as an “emergency fund” and may not be deducted from the budget as otherwise provided by law. Each county may create an emergency fund, and all taxes levied for emergency purposes by any county, when collected, must be deposited in the emergency fund, and must be used only for emergency purposes caused by the destruction or impairment of any county property necessary for the conduct of the affairs of the county or emergencies caused by nature. The emergency fund may not be used for the purchase of road equipment. The emergency fund may not be used for any road construction or maintenance, except for repair of roads damaged by nature within sixty days preceding the determination to expend emergency funds; however, the emergency fund may be used to match federal funds appropriated to mitigate damage to roads related to a federally declared disaster that occurred more than sixty days preceding the determination. Any unexpended balance remaining in the emergency fund at the end of any fiscal year must be kept in the fund. When the amount of money in the emergency fund, plus the amount of money due the fund from outstanding taxes, equals the amount produced by a levy of five mills on the taxable valuation of property in a county with a population of thirty thousand or more, ten mills on the taxable valuation of property in a county with a population of less than thirty thousand but more than five thousand, or fifteen mills on the taxable valuation of property in a county with a population of five thousand or fewer, the levy authorized by this section must be discontinued, and no further levy may be made until required to replenish the emergency fund.

Source:

S.L. 1943, ch. 268, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 57-1528; S.L. 1969, ch. 478, § 1; 1971, ch. 544, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 63; 1983, ch. 606, § 81; 1985, ch. 620, § 1; 2007, ch, 308, § 16; 2009, ch, 536, § 1; 2011, ch. 452, § 2; 2015, ch. 439, § 85, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-28.1.
Judgment or claim payment levy limitations in political subdivisions.

A political subdivision, except a school district, levying a tax for the payment of a judgment or a settlement of a claim in accordance with section 32-12.1-11 may levy a tax not exceeding five mills. If the political subdivision held a liability insurance policy or insurance contract, purchased by a political subdivision or a government self-insurance pool in which the political subdivision participates pursuant to chapter 32-12.1, which provides coverage to at least the liability limits under section 32-12.1-03 and that coverage was in force at the time of the occurrence that gave rise to the claim of relief, the political subdivision may levy a tax not exceeding a total of ten mills for the payment of a judgment or a settlement of a claim in accordance with section 32-12.1-11. The tax levy limitations specified by law do not apply to mill levies under this section, expressed in mills per dollar of taxable valuation of property in the political subdivision.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 606, § 59; 1983, ch. 608, § 16; 1987, ch. 604, § 2; 1997, ch. 488, § 1; 1999, ch. 501, § 4; 2001, ch. 458, § 3; 2001, ch. 510, § 10; 2005, ch. 554, § 1; 2005, ch. 555, § 1; 2015, ch. 439, § 86, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-29.
War emergency fund — Cities. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

57-15-29.1.
War emergency fund may be transferred into general fund. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

57-15-30.
When tax in townships and cities to be levied by county commissioners.

Whenever any city or township having an existing liability or indebtedness is authorized to levy taxes for the payment of the same and fails or refuses to elect proper officers for the government of the municipality, the board of county commissioners of the county in which the municipality is located, upon a proper showing by any person having a legal or subsisting claim against the municipality that there are no legal officers in the municipality authorized to levy a tax for the payment of such indebtedness, shall levy a tax as the governing body would be authorized to levy the same for the payment of such indebtedness. Any person having a claim against such municipality has the same right to enforce the levy of such tax by the board of county commissioners that the person would have had to compel such levy by the officers of the municipality had they been properly elected and qualified.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 143, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 1343; R.C. 1899, § 1321; R.C. 1905, § 1635; C.L. 1913, § 2260; R.C. 1943, § 57-1530; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 248.

57-15-30.1.
Tax levy for township debt or debt existing upon dissolution — Duty of county auditor — Duty of county treasurer.

Whenever any township is indebted to the county in which such township is located and such debt is more than one year past due, the county auditor, upon resolution of the board of county commissioners, shall levy a tax on the property within the township in an amount sufficient to pay the indebtedness, but in no case may the amount of the levy cause the total levy for such township to exceed the maximum levy limitations, including excess levy limitations, provided by law. The county treasurer shall place the taxes collected to the credit of the county in payment or partial payment of the township’s indebtedness.

Upon the dissolution of a civil township, the board of county commissioners of the county in which the township lies shall attach the territory embraced within such township to such assessment district of the county as the board may deem advisable for the purpose of assessment and taxation. In addition to the other levies provided by law, the board shall levy on the taxable property in the township a sum sufficient to discharge all debts and liabilities of the township. The county auditor shall enter the levy on the county tax list to be collected by the county treasurer as other county taxes are collected. The county treasurer shall credit the money derived from such levy to a special fund to be used to pay the dissolved township’s debts and liabilities. Any balance remaining in the special fund after the payment of the debts and liabilities must be transferred for use for road and bridge purposes within the assessment district to which the territory is attached.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 545, § 1; 2015, ch. 439, § 87, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-30.2.
Financial reporting requirements for taxing entities.

The governing body of any county, city, township, school district, park district, recreation service district, rural fire protection district, rural ambulance service district, soil conservation district, conservancy district, water authority, or any other taxing entity authorized to levy property taxes or have property taxes levied on its behalf, in the year for which the levy will apply, shall file with the county auditor of each county in which the taxing entity is located, at a time and in a format prescribed by the county auditor, a financial report for the preceding calendar year showing the ending balances of each fund or account held by the taxing entity during that year.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 92, § 21, effective January 1, 2016; 2021, ch. 91, § 13, effective July 1, 2021.

57-15-31.
Determination of levy.

The amount to be levied by any county, city, township, school district, park district, or other municipality authorized to levy taxes must be computed by deducting from the amount of estimated expenditures for the current fiscal year as finally determined, plus the required reserve fund determined upon by the governing board from the past experience of the taxing district, the total of the following items:

The available surplus consisting of the free and unencumbered cash balance;

Estimated revenues from sources other than direct property taxes;

The total estimated collections from tax levies for previous years;

Expenditures that must be made from bond sources;

The amount of distributions received from an economic growth increment pool under section 57-15-61; and

The estimated amount to be received from payments in lieu of taxes on a project under section 40-57.1-03.

Allowance may be made for a permanent delinquency or loss in tax collection not to exceed five percent of the amount of the levy.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 11; R.C. 1943, § 57-1531; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 249; 1993, ch. 98, § 7; 1994 Sp., ch. 784, § 3; 2009, ch. 535, § 3; 2013, ch. 13, § 53; 2015, ch. 137, § 24, effective July 1, 2015.

57-15-31.1.
Deadline date for amending budgets and certifying taxes.

No taxing district may certify any taxes or amend its current budget and no county auditor may accept a certification of taxes or amended budget after the tenth day of October of each year if such certification or amendment results in a change in the amount of tax levied. The current budget, except for property taxes, may be amended during the year for any revenues and appropriations not anticipated at the time the budget was prepared.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 520, § 1; 1977, ch. 524, § 1; 1981, ch. 578, § 1.

57-15-32.
Certification of levy.

The taxes levied or voted by any city, township, school district, park district, or other municipality authorized to levy taxes must be certified by the officer acting as business manager or clerk of the governing body of such municipality to the county auditor immediately following the action of the governing body, or within ten days thereafter.

Source:

S.L. 1879, ch. 59, § 33; R.C. 1895, § 2641; R.C. 1899, § 2641; R.C. 1905, § 3177; C.L. 1913, § 4237; S.L. 1929, ch. 235, §§ 8, subs. b, 12; R.C. 1943, § 57-1532; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 250.

57-15-33.
Penalty for failure to certify levy. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

57-15-34.
Duty of county auditor upon certification of levy.

The county auditor of each county, upon receipt of tax levies certified to the county auditor by the proper authorities of the state or any taxing district or municipality shall acknowledge receipt thereof to the official so certifying them immediately upon receiving such levies.

Source:

S.L. 1911, ch. 113, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 2149; S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 12; R.C. 1943, § 57-1534.

57-15-35.
Penalty for extending tax beyond levy limit.

Any county auditor who extends taxes in excess of the limitations prescribed by the terms of this chapter shall forfeit a sum of not less than twenty-five dollars and not more than one thousand dollars, the amount to be determined by the court in an action brought in district court by the state’s attorney in the name of the state for the benefit of the county general fund, and if such action of the county auditor is willful, the county auditor also is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 15; R.C. 1943, § 57-1535; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 597.

Cross-References.

Penalty for class A misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

57-15-36.
Tax levy for airport purposes. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 310, § 1; 1947, ch. 347, § 1; 1949, ch. 333, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-1536; S.L. 1983, ch. 593, § 64; 1983, ch. 606, § 82; 2001, ch. 510, § 11; Repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-37.
Tax levy for airport purposes in park districts. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 510, § 13.

57-15-37.1.
Township levy for airport purposes. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 593, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 66; 1983, ch. 606, § 84; Repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-38.
City capital improvements fund levy.

The governing body of any city may levy a tax for a capital improvements fund not exceeding ten mills under section 57-15-10, to be used for one of the purposes specified under subsection 5, when authorized to do so by a majority of the electors voting upon the question at a primary or general election. A ballot submitted to the electors under this subsection may contain multiple questions and each question must specify:

The singular purpose, selected from the purposes specified under subsection 5, for which the levy authority is being sought;

The number of mills requested for the purpose specified in subdivision a; and

The duration of the requested levy authority.

The governing body of any city may levy a tax for a capital improvements fund not exceeding ten mills under section 57-15-10, to be used for any of the purposes specified under subsection 5, when authorized to do so by sixty percent or more of the qualified electors voting upon the question at a primary or general election.

The governing body of any city may levy an additional tax for a capital improvements fund exceeding ten mills but not exceeding twenty mills under subsection 57-15-10, to be used for one of the purposes specified under subsection 5, when authorized to do so by sixty percent or more of the electors voting upon the question at a primary or general election. A ballot submitted to the electors under this subsection may contain multiple questions and each question must specify:

The singular purpose, selected from the purposes specified under subsection 5, for which the levy authority is being sought;

The number of mills requested for the purpose specified in subdivision a; and

The duration of the requested levy authority.

Any excess levy for capital improvements under this section approved by the electors of a city before July 1, 2015, remains effective for ten taxable years or the period of time for which it was approved by the electors, whichever is less, after it was approved, under the provisions of law in effect at the time it was approved. After June 30, 2015, approval or reauthorization by electors of increased levy authority under this section may not be effective for more than ten taxable years.

The capital improvements fund may be used for:

Paying all or part of the construction of waterworks systems, sewage systems, public buildings, or any other public improvements;

Acquiring real estate as a site for public buildings, maintaining structural and mechanical components of public buildings, and furnishing of public buildings;

A city’s participating share in urban renewal programs;

Capital improvements and equipment acquisition and maintaining structural and mechanical components for fire department stations;

Capital improvements and equipment acquisition and maintaining structural and mechanical components for stations for police protection services and correctional facilities; and

Acquiring and developing real estate, capital improvements, buildings, pavement, equipment, and supporting debt service associated with financing for city-supported airports or airport authorities.

The governing body of the city may create the capital improvements fund which may be accumulated in an amount not in excess of twenty percent of the current annual appropriation for all other purposes combined, exclusive of the appropriations to pay interest and principal of the bonded debt, and not in excess of the limitations prescribed by law.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 313, § 1; 1947, ch. 349, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-1538; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 252; 1983, ch. 606, § 85; 2015, ch. 439, § 88; 2017, ch. 410, § 3, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2016.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 88 of chapter 439, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-39.
Disposition of construction fund tax.

Revenues raised for construction purposes must be disposed of as follows:

All revenues accruing from appropriations or tax levies for a construction fund, together with such amounts as may be realized for construction purposes from all other sources, must be placed in a separate fund known as a city construction fund, and must be deposited and held as the sinking funds of such cities are held. Such fund must be used solely and exclusively for the purpose of constructing waterworks systems, sewage systems, public buildings, or such other public improvements as the electors may have authorized and must be paid out by the custodian thereof, only upon order of the governing body of such city, signed by the mayor or president of the board of city commissioners and the city auditor of said city; such order must recite upon its face the purpose for which such payment is made.

Any moneys remaining in a construction fund, after the completion of the payments for any city construction fund project which has cost seventy-five percent or more of the amount in such construction fund at the time of letting the contracts therefor, must be returned to the general fund of the city upon the order of the governing body of such city.

Upon the first day of June of each year, the custodian of any city construction fund shall pay into the general fund of such city any moneys which have remained in such fund for a period of ten years or more. The custodian shall consider that all payments which have been paid from the city construction fund for building purposes have been paid from the fund first acquired.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 313, § 2; 1947, ch. 349, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-1539; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 253.

57-15-40.
Penalty for unlawful withdrawal of construction fund. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

57-15-41.
Political subdivision tax levies for payment of special assessments exempt from levy limitations.

No tax levy limitations provided by any statute of this state apply to tax levies by any county, city, school district, park district, or township for the purpose of paying any special assessments or paying debt service on bonds issued to prepay special assessments made in accordance with the provisions of title 40, against property owned by such county, city, school district, park district, or township. Any surplus in the special assessment fund after all of the special assessments for which the fund was created have been paid shall be placed in the general fund of the political subdivision.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 358, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-1541; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 255; 1975, ch. 521, § 1; 1993, ch. 241, § 2.

57-15-42.
City fire department capital improvements and equipment acquisition funding.

The governing body of any city may provide funding from revenues derived from the capital improvements fund levy under section 57-15-38 for a fire department capital improvements and equipment acquisition and maintaining structural and mechanical components for fire department stations. Any levy under this section approved by the electors of a city before January 1, 2015, remains effective for ten taxable years or the period of time for which it was approved by the voters, whichever is less, under the provisions of this section in effect at the time it was approved. When the authority to levy under this section expires in a city, any unobligated balance in the fire department reserve fund must be transferred to the city capital improvements fund.

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 317, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-1542; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 256; 1975, ch. 522, § 1; 1977, ch. 525, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 67; 1983, ch. 606, § 86; 2015, ch. 439, § 89, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-43.
Tax levy for city having an organized firefighters relief association — Limitations — Disbursement. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 313, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-1543; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 257; 1983, ch. 606, § 87; 1999, ch. 211, § 19; 2015, ch. 439, § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-44.
City tax levy for acquiring real estate for public building. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 318, § 1; 1957, ch. 355, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-1544; S.L. 1967, ch. 430, § 1; 1973, ch. 453, § 1; 1983, ch. 606, § 88; 1983, ch. 611, § 3; 1985, ch. 235, § 102; 1997, ch. 108, § 39; 2015, ch. 439, § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-45.
Resolution and notice of election. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 430, § 2.

57-15-46.
Form of ballot. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 430, § 2.

57-15-47.
Conduct of election. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

57-15-48.
City levy for emergency purposes.

The governing body of any city by a two-thirds vote may levy a tax annually for snow removal, natural disaster, or other emergency conditions not exceeding the limitation in subsection 9 of section 57-15-10. No city may make this levy after the amount of the unexpended funds raised by this levy plus the amount of money due the fund from outstanding taxes equals the amount produced by a levy of five mills on the taxable valuation of property within the city or five dollars per capita, whichever is greater.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 396, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 68; 1983, ch. 606, § 89; 1989, ch. 697, § 2; 2015, ch. 439, § 90, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-49.
School district levy for school library fund. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 608, § 22.

57-15-50.
County emergency medical service levy.

Upon petition of ten percent of the number of qualified electors of the county voting in the last election for governor or upon its own motion, the board of county commissioners of each county shall levy annually a tax not exceeding the limitation in subsection 10 of section 57-15-06.7, for the purpose of subsidizing county emergency medical services; provided, that this tax must be approved by a majority of the qualified electors of the county voting on the question at a regular or special countywide election. The county may budget, in addition to its annual operating budget for subsidizing emergency medical service, no more than ten percent of its annual operating budget as a depreciation expense to be set aside in a dedicated emergency medical services sinking fund deposited with the treasurer for the replacement of equipment and ambulances. The ten percent emergency medical services sinking fund must be in addition to the annual operating budget for subsidization, but the total of the annual operating budget and the annual ten percent emergency medical services sinking fund may not exceed the approved mill levy. If the county contains a rural ambulance service district or rural fire protection district that levies for and provides emergency medical service, the property within that district is exempt from the county tax levy under this section upon notice from the governing body of the district to the board of county commissioners of the existence of the district.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 479, § 1; 1977, ch. 526, § 1; 1979, ch. 171, § 4; 1983, ch. 593, § 69; 1983, ch. 606, § 91; 1985, ch. 235, § 103; 1989, ch. 154, § 3; 1997, ch. 108, § 40; 2001, ch. 246, § 17; 2015, ch. 439, § 91, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-51.
City emergency medical service funding.

The governing body of a city may provide funding from revenues derived from its general fund levy authority for the purpose of subsidizing city emergency medical services. Whenever a tax for county emergency medical services is levied by a county, any city subsidizing city emergency medical services, shall upon written application to the county board of such county be exempted from such county tax levy. The city may set aside, as a depreciation expense, up to ten percent of its annual emergency medical service operating or subsidization budget in a dedicated emergency medical services sinking fund, deposited with the auditor for replacement of equipment and ambulances. The ten percent emergency medical services sinking fund may be in addition to the actual annual emergency medical services budget but the total of the annual emergency medical services budget.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 479, § 2; 1979, ch. 171, § 5; 1983, ch. 593, § 70; 1985, ch. 235, § 104; 1997, ch. 108, § 41; 2001, ch. 246, § 18; 2001, ch. 511, § 4; 2015, ch. 439, § 92, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-51.1.
Funding for township emergency medical service.

The qualified electors of an organized township may authorize the township to provide funding from revenues derived from its general fund levy authority for the purpose of subsidizing township emergency medical service. In providing for emergency medical service, the board of supervisors may cooperate with one or more additional townships or with a city, county, or rural ambulance service district in accordance with chapter 54-40.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 454, § 1; 1979, ch. 171, § 6; 1983, ch. 593, § 71; 1983, ch. 606, § 92; 1985, ch. 235, § 105; 2001, ch. 246, § 19; 2015, ch. 439, § 93, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-52.
School district levy to equip and maintain two-way radios for schoolbuses. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 608, § 22.

57-15-52.1.
School district levy for schoolbus costs. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 608, § 22.

57-15-53.
Police department stations and correctional facilities capital improvements funding.

The governing body of any city may provide funding from revenues derived from the capital improvements fund levy authority under section 57-15-38 for the purpose of providing additional funds to meet the construction costs and costs of maintaining structural and mechanical components of stations for police protection services and correctional facilities. Any levy under this section approved by the electors of a city before January 1, 2015, remains effective for ten taxable years or for the period of time for which it was approved by the voters, whichever is less, under the provisions of this section in effect at the time it was approved. When the authority to levy under this section expires in a city, any unobligated balance in the police station and correctional facility fund must be transferred to the city capital improvements fund.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 481, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 72; 1983, ch. 606, § 95; 2015, ch. 439, § 94, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-54.
Destruction of weeds along highways — Election to be held on question — Tax levy. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 482, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 73; 1983, ch. 606, § 96; Repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-55.
Tax levy for public transportation.

The governing body of any city, upon approval by a majority vote of the qualified electors of the city voting on the question at any citywide election, may annually levy a tax not exceeding the limitation in subsection 10 of section 57-15-10 to provide funds for the provision and operation of a public transportation system within the city under a contract approved by the governing body with a private contractor, or by the city itself.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 483, § 1; 1981, ch. 579, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 74; 1983, ch. 606, § 97; 1997, ch. 108, § 42; 2015, ch. 439, § 95, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-55.1.
City tax levy for transportation of public school students. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 612, § 1; 1985, ch. 82, § 142; 1997, ch. 108, § 43; 2001, ch. 161, § 33; Repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-56.
Authorization of tax levy for services and programs for senior citizens — Elections to authorize or remove the levy — State bonding fund coverage — State matching program for senior citizen services and programs.

The board of county commissioners of any county is hereby authorized to levy a tax, or if no levy is made by the board of county commissioners, the governing body of any city in the county is authorized to levy a tax, in addition to all levies now authorized by law, for the purpose of establishing or maintaining services and programs for senior citizens including the maintenance of existing senior citizen centers which will provide informational, health, welfare, counseling, and referral services for senior citizens, and assisting such persons in providing volunteer community or civic services. If the tax authorized by this section is levied by the board of county commissioners, any existing levy under this section by a city in the county becomes void for subsequent taxable years. The removal of the levy is not subject to the requirements of subsection 3. This tax may not exceed the limitation in subsection 12 of section 57-15-06.7 or subsection 11 of section 57-15-10. The proceeds of the tax must be kept in a separate fund and used exclusively for the public purposes provided for in this section. This levy must be in addition to any moneys expended by the board of county commissioners pursuant to section 11-11-58 or by the governing body of any city pursuant to section 40-05-16.

The levy authorized by this section may not be used to defray any expenses of any organization or agency until the organization or agency is incorporated under the laws of this state as a nonprofit corporation. Governing bodies may enter into contracts with county councils on aging or comparable representative groups in counties or cities that do not have a council on aging to determine jointly and to administer distribution of funds in accordance with the contract and the provisions of this section. To receive any funds under this section, an organization or agency must file with the governing body from which funds are being requested a report of its program for the fiscal year for which the funds are requested. The report must show all financial resources available to the organization or agency and its program, how those resources are budgeted or intended to be used in that fiscal year or in the future, and the purposes for which funds being requested under this section are to be used. An organization or agency and its program which receives funds under the provisions of this section must be reviewed or approved annually by the board of county commissioners or the governing body of the city to determine its eligibility to receive funds under the provisions of this section.

The levy authorized by this section may be imposed or removed only by a vote of a majority of the qualified electors of the county or city voting on the question directing the governing body to do so. The levy authorized by this section may not be increased to a levy of more than one mill under the authority of this section unless approved by a vote of a majority of the qualified electors of the county or city voting on the question. The governing body shall put the issue before the qualified electors either on its own motion or when a petition in writing, signed by qualified electors of the county or city equal in number to at least ten percent of the total vote cast in the county or city for the office of governor of the state at the last general election, is presented to the governing body.

The officers or employees of a nonprofit corporation under contract with the board of county commissioners or the governing body of the city, in regard to the manner in which the funds shall be expended and the services are to be provided, are authorized to receive, and shall be eligible for, bonding coverage through the state bonding fund.

The state treasurer shall provide matching funds as provided in this subsection for counties for senior citizen services and programs funded as required by this section. The grants must be made on or before March first of each year to each eligible county. A county receiving a grant under this section which has not levied a tax under this section shall transfer the amount received to a city within the county which has levied a tax under this section. A grant may not be made to any county that has not filed with the state treasurer a written report verifying that grant funds received in the previous year under this subsection have been budgeted for the same purposes permitted for the expenditure of proceeds of a tax levied under this section. The written report must be received by the state treasurer on or before February first of each year following a year in which the reporting county received grant funds under this subsection. A matching fund grant must be provided from the senior citizen services and programs fund to each eligible county equal to eighty-seven and one-half percent of the amount appropriated in dollars in the county under this section for the taxable year, but the matching fund grant applies only to an amount equal to a levy of up to one mill under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 546, § 1; 1975, ch. 96, § 3; 1977, ch. 528, § 1; 1979, ch. 595, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 75; 1983, ch. 606, § 98; 1983, ch. 613, § 1; 1985, ch. 235, § 106; 1985, ch. 621, § 1; 1987, ch. 681, § 1; 1989, ch. 700, § 1; 1991, ch. 655, § 1; 1997, ch. 108, § 44; 1999, ch. 499, § 3; 2005, ch. 578, § 1; 2011, ch. 453, § 1; 2013, ch. 448, § 1; 2015, ch. 439, § 96; 2015, ch. 441, § 1.

57-15-57.
Levy for county welfare. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 455, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 76; 1983, ch. 606, § 99; 1985, ch. 235, § 107; Repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-58.
Penalty for unlawful withdrawal from fund.

Every officer participating in the unlawful withdrawal from any fund established by this chapter is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 598.

Cross-References.

Penalty for class A misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

57-15-59.
Counties’ and cities’ authority to enter leases for court, corrections, and law enforcement facilities and dedicate mill levies. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 682, § 1; 1995, ch. 554, § 1; Repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-60.
Authorization of tax levy for programs and activities for handicapped persons — Elections to authorize or remove the levy — Handicapped person programs and activities. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 149, § 5; 1997, ch. 108, § 45; 2001, ch. 510, § 12; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.